Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2924
Investment program; duties.

The investment program shall operate in compliance with:

(1) Federal law and program guidance applicable to state infrastructure banks, including capitalization, use-of-funds, and reporting requirements established under 23 U.S.C. 610, or any other applicable federal law, as such federal law existed on January 1, 2026;

(2) State fiscal and procurement laws, except where specific exemptions are provided under the Infrastructure Development Investment Program Act; and

(3) Any cooperative agreements entered into with the United States Department of Transportation and its operating administrations or other federal agencies.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 24.
July 18, 2026